Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.29, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Conduct of hearings. A determination issued by the commissioner may be heard as a contested casedeleted text begin , except thatdeleted text end new text begin .new text end The report of the administrative law judge shall be binding on all parties to the proceeding and if appropriate shall be implemented by an order as provided for in subdivision 3. The party contesting the determination issued by the commissioner may file a request with the commissioner to appear at a hearing on the party's own behalf or through a private attorney. The commissioner shall new text begin decide within 30 days whether to new text end forward the request for hearing to the deleted text begin Officedeleted text end new text begin Courtnew text end of Administrative Hearings, which shall promptly set the matter for hearing. deleted text begin The hearing shall be conducted at a place designated by the commissioner, within the county where the unfair discriminatory practice occurred or where the respondent resides or has a principal place of business.deleted text end The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with sections 14.57 to 14.62, and is subject to appeal in accordance with sections 14.63 to 14.68.